Utah statutes.
77-5-5.   Hearing, notice of -- Defendant served with articles.
The Senate shall assign a day for the hearing of the impeachment and inform
the House of Representatives. The president of the Senate shall cause a copy
of the articles of impeachment, with a notice to appear and answer the same at
the time and place appointed, to be served on the officer being impeached not
less than 10 days before the day fixed for the hearing.
